Massachusetts, session 194th, S2259.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (b)(1) of Section 4 of chapter 150F of the General Laws is
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following
sentence:- Since the obligation to negotiate in good faith includes an obligation to provide
requested information that relates to the bargaining process, it is also an unfair work practice for
a certified or recognized transportation network driver organization to refuse to provide
information requested by a transportation network company that is relevant to the bargaining
process.
SECTION 2. Chapter 150F of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
following section:- Section 13. Any record furnished to the board or other state agency by a
transportation network company pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to,
transportation network driver records, shall not be considered a public record as defined in clause
twenty-sixth of section 7 of chapter 4 or chapter 66 of the General Laws. Such records are
of 3

confidential and shall not be disclosed by the board or by any persons who may be authorized by
the board to control or process them solely for purposes of Chapter 150F.
SECTION 3. The board shall promulgate regulations to implement chapter 150F no later
than [December 31, 2025]. The board shall implement such regulations no later than [June 30,
2026] Chapter 150F shall take effect upon the board’s implementation of the regulations
required by this section. The regulations shall: (a) establish the obligations and procedures for
the board and transportation network driver organizations to protect transportation network
driver data from public disclosure and unauthorized use, including: (i) minimization of data
collected to what is necessary under chapter 150F; (ii) encryption standards adhering to
recognized security protocols; (iii) access controls to ensure that only authorized persons can
view or process driver data; (iv) data retention policy; (v) auditing and compliance monitoring;
(vi) data breach protocol; (vii) driver notification of data sharing; (viii) driver consent and driver
opt-out of data sharing; and (ix) limitations on data use; (x) limiting the disclosure of driver
personal identifying information to the confidential uses necessary to effectuate Chapter 150F
and not for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration law or provided to an agency that
primarily enforces immigration law, unless the Board is provided with a lawful court order or
judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed pursuant to Article III of the United States
Constitution, a federal grand jury or trial subpoena, or as otherwise required by federal law; (b)
establish authorization card requirements, including the specific form and content of
authorization cards and authorization revocation cards, receipt records, language access and
limited English proficiency protections, authentication standards for both electronic and non-
electronic authorization cards, data security, submission requirements, and the board’s audit
review authority; (c) establish procedures for verifying transportation network driver
of 3

organization representation evidence; (d) establish procedures for verifying that “active
transportation network drivers,” as defined in Subsection (a) Section 2 of Chapter 150F, includes
only those independent contractors currently authorized to provide Transportation Network
Company services by the Transportation Network Company Division of the Department of
Public Utilities (DPU), who hold a current Background Check Clearance Certificate, meet all
safety and suitability standards required by DPU regulations, are affiliated with an entity holding
a current DPU permit, and use non-commercial vehicles to provide transportation network
company services; (e) establish how the median number of rides by authorized transportation
network drivers will be determined to set the quarterly active transportation network driver
thresholds; (f) establish the specific subjects of bargaining under terms and conditions of work;
(g) establish election procedures for exclusive bargaining representations; specify how and when
transportation network companies must share driver data with transportation network driver
organizations while protecting drivers’ privacy and complying with data security laws; (h)
establish complaint and grievance processes; (i) establish mediation and arbitration rules; and (j)
establish standards and procedures for board oversight of bargaining agreements.
of 3